test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_mishoomis_gt-norm.yaml
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisensinaanidig, nimishoomisensinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisensinaanidig, nimishoomisensinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisensinaanidig, nimishoomisensinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisenyinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisenyinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisenyinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisenyinaanidig, gimishoomisenyinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisenyinaanidig, gimishoomisenyinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisenyinaanidig, gimishoomisenyinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisenyiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisenyiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisenyiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisenyiwaadig, gimishoomisenyiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisenyiwaadig, gimishoomisenyiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisenyiwaadig, gimishoomisenyiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisensinaanidig, gimishoomisensinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisensinaanidig, gimishoomisensinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensinaanidig, gimishoomisensinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisensiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisensiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisensiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisensiwaadig, gimishoomisensiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisensiwaadig, gimishoomisensiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisensiwaadig, gimishoomisensiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyiniidig, omishoomisenyiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyiniidig, omishoomisenyiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyiniidig, omishoomisenyiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisenyiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisenyiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisenyiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisenyiwaadig, omishoomisenyiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisenyiwaadig, omishoomisenyiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisenyiwaadig, omishoomisenyiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensiniidig, omishoomisensiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensiniidig, omishoomisensiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensiniidig, omishoomisensiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisensiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisensiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisensiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisensiwaadig, omishoomisensiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisensiwaadig, omishoomisensiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisensiwaadig, omishoomisensiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisimishinaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisimishinaanidig, nimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimishoomisimishinaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisimishinaanidig, gimishoomisimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisimishiwaaban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimishoomisimishiwaadig, gimishoomisimishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omishoomisimishiniiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omishoomisimishiniidig, omishoomisimishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omishoomisimishiwaaban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omishoomisimishiwaadig, omishoomisimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimishoomisimishinaaning
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimishoomisimishinaanin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimishoomisimishinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimishoomisimishinaaning
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimishoomisimishinaanin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimishoomisimishinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimishoomisimishiwaang
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimishoomisimishiwaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimishoomisimishiwaag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omishoomisimishiniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omishoomisimishiniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omishoomisimishiniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omishoomisimishiwaang
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omishoomisimishiwaan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omishoomisimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisimishibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisimishibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisimishibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisimishibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisimishibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisimishibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omishoomisimishibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omishoomisimishibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omishoomisimishibaniig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imishoomisimishibaniing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imishoomisimishibaniin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imishoomisimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisiminaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisiminaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisiminaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisiminaanidig, nimishoomisiminaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisiminaanidig, nimishoomisiminaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisiminaanidig, nimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisiminaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisiminaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisiminaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisiminaanidig, gimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisiminaanidig, gimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisiminaanidig, gimishoomisiminaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisimiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisimiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisimiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisimiwaadig, gimishoomisimiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisimiwaadig, gimishoomisimiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisimiwaadig, gimishoomisimiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisiminiibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisiminiibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisiminiibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisiminiidig, omishoomisiminiidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisiminiidig, omishoomisiminiidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisiminiidig, omishoomisiminiidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisimiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisimiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisimiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisimiwaadig, omishoomisimiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisimiwaadig, omishoomisimiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisimiwaadig, omishoomisimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimishoomisishinaanibaniing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimishoomisishinaanibaniin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimishoomisishinaanibaniig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimishoomisishinaanidig, nimishoomisishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimishoomisishinaanidig, nimishoomisishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimishoomisishinaanidig, nimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisishinaanibaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisishinaanibaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisishinaanibaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisishinaanidig, gimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisishinaanidig, gimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisishinaanidig, gimishoomisishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimishoomisishiwaabaniing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimishoomisishiwaabaniin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimishoomisishiwaabaniig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimishoomisishiwaadig, gimishoomisishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimishoomisishiwaadig, gimishoomisishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimishoomisishiwaadig, gimishoomisishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omishoomisishiniibaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omishoomisishiniibaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omishoomisishiniibaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisishiniidig, omishoomisishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisishiniidig, omishoomisishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisishiniidig, omishoomisishiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omishoomisishiwaabaniing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omishoomisishiwaabaniin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omishoomisishiwaabaniig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omishoomisishiwaadig, omishoomisishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omishoomisishiwaadig, omishoomisishiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omishoomisishiwaadig, omishoomisishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisenyimishinaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, nimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisensimishinaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisensimishinaanidig, nimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimishoomisenyimishinaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisenyimishinaanidig, gimishoomisenyimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisenyimishiwaaban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimishoomisenyimishiwaadig, gimishoomisenyimishiwaadog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimishoomisensimishinaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisensimishinaanidig, gimishoomisensimishinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisensimishiwaaban
